Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-102.01
Military personnel; deemed residents; when.

For purposes of adoption, persons serving in the armed forces of the United States, who have been continuously stationed at any military base or installation in the State of Nebraska for the period of one year immediately preceding the filing of a petition for adoption shall be deemed residents in good faith of this state and the county where such military base or installation is located.

Laws 1969, c. 337, § 1, p. 1196.